Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.076

State building code council—Open public access information technologies.

The building code council, in consultation with Washington technology solutions, shall assess the costs and benefits of the potential acquisition and implementation of open public access information technologies to enhance the council's code adoption process and report back to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2018.

[ 2024 c 54 s 25; 2018 c 207 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 207 ss 1-8: See note following RCW 19.27.070.